Idaho statutes. Title 48 MONOPOLIES AND TRADE PRACTICES
Chapter 6 CONSUMER PROTECTION ACT
§ 48-611. Investigative demand by attorney general — Report required.

When the attorney general has reason to believe that a person has engaged in, is engaging in, or is about to engage in any act or practice declared to be unlawful by this act, he may execute in writing and cause to be served upon any person who is believed to have information, documentary material or physical evidence relevant to the alleged or suspected violation, an investigative demand requiring such person to furnish a report in writing setting forth the relevant facts and circumstances of which he has knowledge, or to appear and testify or to produce relevant documentary material or physical evidence for examination, at such reasonable time and place as may be stated in the investigative demand, concerning the advertisement, sale or offering for sale of any goods or services or the conduct of any trade or commerce that is the subject matter of the investigation. The return date in said investigative demand shall be not less than twenty (20) days after serving of the demand.

At any time before the return date specified in an investigative demand, or within twenty (20) days after the demand has been served, whichever period is shorter, a petition to extend the return date, or to modify or set aside the demand, stating good cause, may be filed in the district court of the county where the person served with the demand resides or has his principal place of business or in the district court in Ada County.

§ 48-612. Additional powers of attorney general.

To accomplish the objectives and to carry out the duties prescribed by this chapter, the attorney general, in addition to other powers conferred upon him by this chapter, may issue subpoenas to any person and conduct hearings in aid of any investigation or inquiry; provided that information obtained pursuant to the powers conferred in this chapter shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.

§ 48-613. Service of notice.

Service of any notice, demand or subpoena under this act shall be made personally within this state, but if such cannot be obtained, substituted service therefor may be made in the following manner:

Personal service thereof without this state; or

The mailing thereof by registered or certified mail to the last known place of business, residence or abode within or without this state or such person for whom the same is intended; or

As to any person other than a natural person, in the manner provided in the Idaho rules of civil procedure as if a complaint which institutes a civil proceeding had been filed.

§ 48-614. Failure to obey attorney general — Application to district court.

If any person fails or refuses to file any statement or report, or obey any subpoena or investigative demand issued by the attorney general, the attorney general may, after notice, apply to a district court of the county in which the person resides or has a principal place of business, or if the person does not reside in or have a principal place of business in this state, the attorney general may apply to any district court in this state and, after hearing thereon, request an order:

Ordering such person to file such statement or report, or to comply with the subpoena or investigative demand issued by the attorney general;

Granting injunctive relief to restrain the person from engaging in the advertising or sale of any merchandise or the conduct of any trade or commerce that is involved in the alleged or suspected violation; and

Granting such other relief as may be required, until the person files the statement or report, or obeys the subpoena or investigative demand.

The court shall award the prevailing party reasonable expenses and attorney fees incurred in obtaining an order under the provisions of this section if the court finds that the attorney general’s request for an order under this section or a person’s resistance to filing any statement or report, or obeying any subpoena or investigative demand, was without a reasonable basis in fact or law.

Any disobedience of any final order entered under the provisions of this section by any court shall be punished as a contempt thereof. Contempt penalties sued for and recovered by the attorney general shall be remitted to the consumer protection account [consumer protection fund] created in section 48-606, Idaho Code, and shall be used for the furtherance of the attorney general’s duties and activities under the provisions of this chapter.

§ 48-615. Violation of injunction — Civil penalty.

Any person who violates the terms of an injunction issued or consent order entered into pursuant to section 48-606, Idaho Code, or an order entered into pursuant to section 48-614, Idaho Code, shall forfeit and pay to the state a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation, the amount of the penalty to be determined by the district court issuing the injunction. For the purposes of this section, the district court issuing an injunction shall retain jurisdiction, and the cause shall be continued, and in such cases the attorney general acting in the name of the state may petition for recovery of civil penalties. Said civil penalties sued for and recovered by the attorney general shall be remitted to the consumer protection account [consumer protection fund] created in section 48-606, Idaho Code, and shall be used for the furtherance of the attorney general’s duties and activities under the provisions of this chapter.

§ 48-616. Forfeiture of corporate franchise.

Upon petition by the attorney general, the district court of the county in which the principal place of business of the corporation is located may, in its discretion, order the dissolution or suspension or forfeiture of franchise of any corporation which violates the terms of any injunction issued under section 48-606, Idaho Code.

§ 48-617. Local law enforcement officials — Duties.

It shall be the duty of local law enforcement officials to provide the attorney general such assistance as the attorney general may request in the investigation, commencement and prosecution of actions pursuant to this chapter.

§ 48-618. Construction of chapter.

This act is to be construed uniformly with federal law and regulations. In any action instituted under this act it shall be an absolute defense to show the challenged practices are subject to and comply with statutes administrated by the federal trade commission, or any duties, regulations or decisions interpreting such statutes.

§ 48-619. Limitation of action.

No private action may be brought under this act more than two (2) years after the cause of action accrues.